Wyoming, session 2025, HB0244.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-26-814 and 1-26-815(a) are amended
to read:

1-26-814. Right of eminent domain granted;
exceptions; petroleum or other pipeline companies;
purposes.
HB0244

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0398

(a) Whenever any utility or any petroleum or other
pipeline company, authorized to do business in this state,
has not acquired by gift or purchase any land, real estate
or claim required for the construction, maintenance and
operation of their facilities and appurtenances or which
may be affected by any operation connected with the
construction or maintenance of the same, the utility or
company has the right of eminent domain and may condemn the
easement required by the utility or company, except as
provided by subsection (b) of this section.

(b) No person shall use the power of eminent domain
to place pipelines for the purpose of conveying or storing
carbon dioxide for the purpose of carbon capture,
utilization or storage in order to meet the low-carbon
energy standards specified under W.S. 37-18-101 and
37-18-102.

1-26-815. Right of eminent domain granted; ways of
necessity for authorized businesses; purposes; extent.

HB0244

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0398
(a) Except as provided by W.S. 1-26-814(b), any
person, association, company or corporation authorized to
do business in this state may appropriate by condemnation a
way of necessity over, across or on so much of the lands or
real property of others as necessary for the location,
construction, maintenance and use of reservoirs, drains,
flumes, ditches including return flow and wastewater
ditches, underground water pipelines, pumping stations and
other necessary appurtenances, canals, electric power
transmission lines and distribution systems, railroad
trackage, sidings, spur tracks, tramways, roads or mine
truck haul roads required in the course of their business
for agricultural, mining, exploration drilling and
production of oil and gas, milling, electric power
transmission and distribution, domestic, municipal or
sanitary purposes, or for the transportation of coal from
any coal mine or railroad line or for the transportation of
oil and gas from any well.

Section 2. This act shall apply to carbon capture,
utilization and storage projects for which construction
commences on or after July 1, 2025.

HB0244

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0398
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0244